Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Naturally Occurring Asbestos.

Sec. 18.31.250.
Use of materials containing naturally occurring asbestos.

A principal construction contractor or, in the absence of an identified principal construction contractor, person having legal authority for the design and construction of a project may qualify for immunity in a civil action under AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

for the use of gravel or other aggregate material that, when tested using a bulk test method prescribed by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities by regulation, is determined to have a content equal to or greater than 0.25 percent of naturally occurring asbestos by mass.

To qualify for the immunity provided under AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

, before initiating a construction project not subject to AS

44.42.410

(b) that is within an area designated by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

44.42.400(b)

or (c) and that will use gravel or other aggregate material that contains naturally occurring asbestos, the principal construction contractor or, in the absence of an identified principal construction contractor, the person having legal authority for the design and construction of the project shall prepare and submit to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities specific project plans demonstrating compliance with the standards adopted by the department under AS

44.42.420

and the requirements of the site-specific use plan under AS

44.42.410

. Before extraction of gravel or other aggregate material may begin, the plan must be approved and returned to the contractor by the department.

To preserve the immunity provided under AS

09.65.245(a)(2)

, the principal construction contractor or, in the absence of an identified principal construction contractor, the person having legal authority for the design and construction of the project shall adhere to the site-specific use plan approved by the department and the monitoring and mitigation plan created by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For interim project authorization authority of the Department of Public Transportation and Facilities, see § 4, ch. 13, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For interim standard for asbestos bulk testing, see § 5, ch. 13, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.31.260.
Presence of naturally occurring asbestos.

The state shall consider 0.25 percent by mass, the minimum detectable amount of asbestos under the California Air Resources Board Method 435, as the baseline for the presence of naturally occurring asbestos in gravel or other aggregate material.

History.

(§ 2 ch 13 SLA 2012)